Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2204
Annual occupation tax; levy; when due.

Municipalities may, by appropriate ordinance, levy an annual occupation tax against any person, firm, or corporation now maintaining and operating any community antenna television service within its boundaries; and may levy an annual occupation tax against any persons, firms, or corporations hereafter constructing, installing, operating, or maintaining such community antenna television service. Any such occupation tax so levied shall be due and payable on May 1 of each year to the treasurer of such city or village.

Laws 1959, c. 68, § 4, p. 295;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2804;

Laws 1969, c. 119, § 4, p. 538.

The power granted by this section to the city to levy by ordinance an occupation tax upon community antenna television service is a special statute which takes precedence over the general provisions of section 14-811 requiring submission of franchise annuity or royalty to the electorate. Hall v. Cox Cable of Omaha, Inc., 212 Neb. 887, 327 N.W.2d 595 (1982).